Massachusetts, session 194th, H1301.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 90, section 32C is amended by striking the first paragraph
and replacing it with the following: -
No person engaged in the business of leasing motor vehicles or trailers under the
''drive-
it-yourself'' system, so called, , wherein the amount of the rental is determinable in whole
or in
part by the distance such motor vehicles or trailers travel or any similar system including
rentals based
on daily, weekly, hourly or monthly rental rates, shall lease any such vehicle whereto is
attached a hubodometer or other mechanical device for the purpose of registering the
distance
of 3

that such vehicle travels which does not register such distance with substantial accuracy,
nor
shall any such person, herein and in the following three sections called the lessor,
knowingly
deceive any lessee of any such vehicle under any such system, herein and in the
following three
sections called the lessee, as to the distance which such vehicle has traveled under the
lease, or
make or collect a charge for the use thereof based wholly or in part on such deception, or
lease
any such vehicle for operation on any public way by any person whom he knows or has
reason to
believe to be under the influence of intoxicating liquor or of any drug. No lessor shall
lease any
motor vehicle or trailer until the lessee shows that he or his authorized operator is the
holder of a
duly issued license to operate the type of motor vehicle or trailer which is being leased.
Further, no
lessor is required to verify such license with the Registry of Motor Vehicles or via any
other electronic
of 3

services.
SECTION 2. Section 32E is amended by striking the title and replacing it with the
following: -
Section 32E: Leasing motor vehicles on mileage basis; operation of vehicles or
use of
trailers; insurance coverage; vehicles leased on daily, weekly, hourly or monthly rental
rate
Section 32E is further amended by striking the second paragraph and replacing
it with the following:
Every lessor shall provide and maintain, during such time as he engages in the business
of leasing motor vehicles under any system referred to in section thirty-two C, a motor vehicle
liability policy or bond or deposit up to the minimum financial requirements imposed on owners
or registrants , on a secondary or contingent basis if the lessee or operator does not have a motor
vehicle liability policy, or other coverage, which, in addition to providing indemnity, protection
or security for personal injuries, shall, except in the case of vehicles leased for a term of more
than thirty days, further provide indemnity, protection or security for damage to property as
required by the provisions of this chapter. If another valid and collectible liability policy or other
form of financial security satisfies the minimum financial requirements imposed on owners or
registrants, a lessor’s obligation under the law is satisfied.
SECTION 3. Section 34M is further amended by adding the following words:
“and/or thirty-two E” any time “section thirty-four A” appears in this section. -,
of 3